California statutes. Education Code
(a) Contract employees shall be evaluated at least once in each academic year. Regular employees shall be evaluated at least once in every three academic years. Temporary employees shall be evaluated within the first year of employment. Thereafter, evaluation shall be at least once every six regular semesters, or once every nine regular quarters, as applicable.

(b) Whenever an evaluation is required of a faculty member by a community college district, the evaluation shall be conducted in accordance with the standards and procedures established by the rules and regulations of the governing board of the employing district.

(c) Evaluations shall include, but not be limited to, a peer review process. 

(d) The peer review process shall be on a departmental or divisional basis, and shall address the forthcoming demographics of California, and the principles of affirmative action. The process shall require that the peers reviewing are both representative of the diversity of California and sensitive to affirmative action concerns, all without compromising quality and excellence in teaching.

(e) The Legislature recognizes that faculty evaluation procedures may be negotiated as part of the collective bargaining process.

(f) In those districts where faculty evaluation procedures are collectively bargained, the faculty’s exclusive representative shall consult with the academic senate prior to engaging in collective bargaining regarding those procedures.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that faculty evaluation include, to the extent practicable, student evaluation.

(h) A probationary faculty member shall be accorded the right to be evaluated under clear, fair, and equitable evaluation procedures locally defined through the collective bargaining process where the faculty has chosen to elect an exclusive representative. Those procedures shall ensure good-faith treatment of the probationary faculty member without according him or her de facto tenure rights. 

(i) Governing boards shall establish and disseminate written evaluation procedures for administrators. It is the intent of the Legislature that evaluation of administrators include, to the extent possible, faculty evaluation.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 973) by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 114.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87664.

The governing board of each district, in consultation with the faculty, shall adopt rules and regulations establishing the specific procedures for the evaluation of its contract and regular employees on an individual basis and setting forth reasonable but specific standards which it expects its faculty to meet in the performance of their duties. Such procedures and standards shall be uniform for all contract employees of the district with similar general duties and responsibilities and shall be uniform for all regular employees of the district with similar general duties and responsibilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 115.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87665.

(a) Consistent with subdivision (b), the governing board of a community college district may terminate the employment of a temporary employee at its discretion at the end of a day or week, whichever is appropriate. The decision to terminate the employment is not subject to judicial review except as to the time of termination.

(b) If the governing board of a community college district terminates the employment of a temporary employee pursuant to subdivision (a), the procedure for terminating the temporary employee shall
 comply with the provisions of the local collective bargaining agreement that pertain to the termination of a temporary employee.

(c) In all cases, part-time faculty assignments shall be temporary in nature, contingent on enrollment and funding, and subject to program changes, and no part-time faculty member shall have reasonable assurance of continued
 employment at any point, irrespective of the status, length of service, or reemployment preference of that part-time, temporary faculty member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 288, Sec. 1.   (AB 1028)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

87666.

During the school year, all contract and regular employees are subject to dismissal and the imposition of penalties on the grounds and pursuant to procedures set forth in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87667.

A contract or regular employee may be dismissed or penalized for one or more of the grounds set forth in Section 87732.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87668.

A governing board may impose one of the following penalties:

(a) Suspension for up to one year.

(b) Suspension for up to one year and a reduction or loss of compensation during the period of suspension.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87669.

The governing board shall determine whether a contract or regular employee is to be dismissed or penalized. If the employee is to be penalized, the governing board shall determine the nature of those penalties. If the employee is to be dismissed or penalized, the governing board shall determine whether the decision shall be imposed immediately or postponed in accordance with Section 87672.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87670.

The procedure set forth in this article does not apply to an immediate suspension effected under Section 87736.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 116.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87671.

A contract or regular employee may be dismissed or penalized if one or more of the grounds set forth in Section 87732 are present and the following are satisfied:

(a) The employee has been evaluated in accordance with standards and procedures established in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(b) The district governing board has received all statements of evaluation which considered the events for which dismissal or penalties may be imposed.

(c) The district governing board has received recommendations of the superintendent of the district and, if the employee is working for a community college, the recommendations of the president of that community college.

(d) The district governing board has considered the statements of evaluation and the recommendations in a lawful meeting of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87672.

If a governing board decides it intends to dismiss or penalize a contract or regular employee, it shall deliver a written statement, duly signed and verified, to the employee setting forth the complete and precise decision of the governing board and the reasons therefor.

The written statement shall be delivered by serving it personally on the employee or by mailing it by United States registered mail to the employee at his or her address last known to the district.

A governing board may postpone the operative date of a decision to dismiss or impose penalties for a period not to exceed one year, subject to the employee’s satisfying his or her legal responsibilities as determined by statute and rules and regulations of the district. At the end of this period of probation, the decision shall be made operative or permanently set aside by the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 159.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87673.

If the employee objects to the decision of the governing board, or the reasons therefor, on any ground, the employee shall notify, in writing, the governing board, the superintendent of the district which employs him or her, and the president of the college at which the employee serves of his or her objection within 30 days of the date of the service of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 160.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87674.

Within 30 days of the receipt by the district governing board of the employee’s demand for a hearing, the employee and the governing board shall agree upon an arbitrator to hear the matter. When there is agreement as to the arbitrator, the employee and the governing board shall enter into the records of the governing board written confirmation of the agreement signed by the employee and an authorized representative of the governing board. Upon entry of such confirmation, the arbitrator shall assume complete and sole jurisdiction over the matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87675.

The arbitrator shall conduct proceedings in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that the right of discovery of the parties shall not be limited to those matters set forth in Section 11507.6 of the Government Code but shall include the rights and duties of any party in a civil action brought in a superior court under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure. In all cases, discovery shall be completed prior to one week before the date set for hearing. The arbitrator shall determine whether there is cause to dismiss or penalize the employee. If the arbitrator finds cause, the arbitrator shall determine whether the employee shall be dismissed, the precise penalty to be imposed, and whether the decision should be imposed immediately or postponed pursuant to Section 87672.

No witness shall be permitted to testify at the hearing except upon oath or affirmation. No testimony shall be given or evidence introduced relating to matters that occurred more than four years prior to the date of the filing of the notice. Evidence of records regularly kept by the governing board concerning the employee may be introduced, but no decision relating to the dismissal or suspension of any employee shall be made based on charges or evidence of any nature relating to matters occurring more than four years prior to the filing of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

87676.

In the case in which the arbitrator determines that the operation of his or her decision should be postponed, any question of terminating the postponement shall be determined by the arbitrator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 162.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87677.

The district alone shall pay the arbitrator’s fees and expenses, and the costs of the proceedings as determined by the arbitrator. The “cost of the proceedings” does not include any expenses paid by the employee for his or her counsel, witnesses, or the preparation or presentation of evidence on his or her behalf.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 163.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87678.

If within 30 days of the receipt of the notification by the district governing board, no written confirmation of agreement of the employee and the governing board as to an arbitrator has been submitted to the secretary of the governing board for entry into its records, the governing board shall certify the matter to the Office of Administrative Hearings and request the appointment of an administrative law judge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 324, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

87679.

The administrative law judge shall conduct proceedings in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except that the right of discovery of the parties shall not be limited to those matters set forth in Section 11507.6 of the Government Code but shall include the rights and duties of any party in a civil action brought in a superior court under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure. In all cases, discovery shall be completed prior to one week before the date set for hearing. The written notice delivered to the employee pursuant to Section 87672 shall be deemed an accusation. The written objection of the employee delivered pursuant to Section 87673 shall be deemed the notice of defense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

87680.

The administrative law judge shall determine whether there is cause to dismiss or penalize the employee. If he or she finds cause, he or she shall determine whether the employee shall be dismissed and determine the precise penalty to be imposed, and shall determine whether his or her decision should be imposed immediately or postponed pursuant to Section 87672.

No witness shall be permitted to testify at the hearing except upon oath or affirmation. No testimony shall be given or evidence introduced relating to matters which occurred more than four years prior to the date of the filing of the notice. Evidence of records regularly kept by the governing board concerning the employee may be introduced, but no decision relating to the dismissal or suspension of any employee shall be made based on charges or evidence of any nature relating to matters occurring more than four years prior to the filing of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 324, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

87681.

In the case in which the administrative law judge determines that the operation of his or her decision should be postponed, any question of terminating the postponement shall be brought to the administrative law judge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 324, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

87682.

The decision of the arbitrator or administrative law judge, as the case may be, may, on petition of either the governing board or the employee, be reviewed by a court of competent jurisdiction in the same manner as a decision made by an administrative law judge under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The court, on review, shall exercise its independent judgment on the evidence. The proceeding shall be set for hearing at the earliest possible date and shall take precedence over all other cases, except older matters of the same character and matters to which special precedence is given by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 324, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

87683.

The charges levied by the Office of Administrative Hearings shall be paid by the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Miscellaneous [87700. - 87715.]

87700.

Every person employed by a community college district as a contract or regular employee in an academic position who enters the active military service of the United States of America or of the State of California, including active service in any uniformed auxiliary of, or to, any branch of such military service, created or authorized as such auxiliary by the Congress of the United States of America or by the Legislature of the State of California, or in the service of the United States Merchant Marine, or in full-time paid service of the American Red Cross, during any period of national emergency declared by the President of the United States of America or during any war in which the United States of America is engaged, shall be entitled to absent himself or herself from his or her duties as an employee of the district.

Such absence shall not affect in any way the classification of the employee. In the case of a contract employee, the period of the absence shall not count as part of the service required as a condition precedent to the classification of the employee as a regular employee of the district, but such absence shall not be construed as a break in the continuity of the service of the employee for any purpose.

The dismissal or termination of any contract employee because of reduced attendance due to war conditions, after his or her entry into the active military service or service in the American Red Cross, shall not deprive him or her of any of the benefits of this section.

Within six months after the employee honorably leaves the service or has been placed on inactive duty he or she shall, subject to the provisions of this section, be entitled to return to the position held by him or her at the time of his or her entrance into the service, at the salary to which he or she would have been entitled had he or she not absented himself or herself from the service of the district under this section.

If the employee was employed under a lawful contract for a period in excess of one year in a position in which he or she had not become a regular employee of the district, he or she shall be entitled to return to the position for the period his or her contract of employment had to run at the time he or she entered the service. Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, a person employed to take the place of any such employee shall not have any right to the position following the return of the employee to the position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 119.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87701.

Every person employed by a community college district as a permanent employee in an academic position who is elected to the Legislature shall be granted a leave of absence from his or her duties as an employee of the district by the governing board of the district.

During the term of the leave of absence, the employee may be employed by the district to perform less than full-time service, for compensation and upon terms and conditions, as may be mutually agreed upon.

This absence shall not affect in any way the classification of the employee.

Within six months after the term of office of the employee expires, he or she is entitled to return to the position held by him or her at the time of his or her election, at the salary to which he or she would have been entitled had he or she not absented himself or herself from the service of the district under this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, a person employed to take the place of any such employee shall not have any right to the position following the return of the employee to the position.

This section shall apply to any permanent employee who held the office of Member of the Assembly or State Senator on or after January 4, 1965.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 164.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

87706.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, no community college district, or any officer or employee of such district or board shall be responsible or in any way liable for the conduct or safety of any student of the public schools at any time when such student is not in school property, unless such district has undertaken to provide transportation for such student to and from the school premises, has undertaken a school-sponsored activity off the premises of such school, has otherwise specifically assumed such responsibility or liability or has failed to exercise reasonable care under the circumstances.

In the event of such a specific undertaking, the district shall be liable or responsible for the conduct or safety of any student only while such student is or should be under the immediate and direct supervision of an employee of such district or board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87708.

(a) Every parent, guardian, or other person who assaults or abuses any academic employee in the presence or hearing of a community college student is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any parent, guardian, or other person who assaults or abuses any academic employee in the presence of other community college personnel or students and at a place which is on community college premises or public sidewalks, streets, or other public ways adjacent to school premises, or at some other place where the employee is required to be in connection with assigned college activities is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 121.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87714.

The chief executive officer of each community college district shall, at times as required by the board of governors, provide an affidavit that, during the 12 months preceding the execution of the affidavit, all academic employees of the district possessed the required minimum qualifications for the work they performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 122.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87715.

A full-time contract or regular classroom instructor currently employed by a community college district that decides to maintain classes on Saturday or Sunday, or both, shall not, without his or her written consent, be required to instruct under that program for more than 180 full days during a college year, or for more than the number of full days the colleges of the district were maintained during the year preceding implementation of weekend classes, whichever is greater. This section shall not be construed as limiting the power of any governing board of a community college district to govern the colleges of the district, including the assignment of instructors employed by the district. No such classroom instructor shall be assigned to perform services on a Saturday or Sunday if the instructor objects in writing that the assignment would conflict with his or her religious beliefs or practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 165.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Termination of Services and Reduction in Force [87730. - 87740.]

87730.

Governing boards of community college districts shall accept the resignation of any employee and shall fix the time when the resignation takes effect, which shall not be later than the close of the school year during which the resignation has been received by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

87731.

Whenever any academic employee of any community college district who, at the time of his or her resignation, was classified as regular, is reemployed within 39 months after his or her last day of paid service, the governing board of the district shall, disregarding the break in service, classify him or her as, and restore to him or her all of the rights, benefits and burdens of, a regular employee, except as otherwise provided in this code; provided, that time spent in active military service, as defined in Section 87700, subsequent to the last day of paid service shall not count as part of the aforesaid 39-month period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 124.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87732.

No regular employee or academic employee shall be dismissed except for one or more of the following causes:

(a) Immoral or unprofessional conduct.

(b) Dishonesty.

(c) Unsatisfactory performance.

(d) Evident unfitness for service.

(e) Physical or mental condition that makes him or her unfit to instruct or associate with students.

(f) Persistent violation of, or refusal to obey, the school laws of the state or reasonable regulations prescribed for the government of the community colleges by the board of governors or by the governing board of the community college district employing him or her.

(g) Conviction of a felony or of any crime involving moral turpitude.

(h) Conduct specified in Section 1028 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

87733.

No report on the fitness of a faculty member in a dismissal proceeding shall be received from a statewide professional organization by a governing board unless the employee shall have been given, prior to the preparation of the report in its final form, the opportunity to submit in writing his or her comments on the report and unless a copy of the report in final form is given to the employee investigated at least 10 days prior to its submission to the board. The report shall not be distributed other than to the governing board and those persons participating in its preparation unless the employee does not demand a hearing as provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 126.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87734.

The governing board of any community college district shall not act upon any charges of unprofessional conduct or unsatisfactory performance unless during the preceding term or half college year prior to the date of the filing of the charge, and at least 90 days prior to the date of the filing, the board or its authorized representative has given the employee against whom the charge is filed, written notice of the unprofessional conduct or unsatisfactory performance, specifying the nature thereof with specific instances of behavior and with particularity as to furnish the employee an opportunity to correct his or her faults and overcome the grounds for the charge. The written notice shall include the evaluation made pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 87660), if applicable to the employee. “Unprofessional conduct” and “unsatisfactory performance,” as used in this section, means, and refers only to, the unprofessional conduct and unsatisfactory performance particularly specified as a cause for dismissal in Section 87732 and does not include any other cause for dismissal specified in Section 87732.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 63, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

87735.

Upon the filing of written charges, duly signed and verified by the person filing them with the governing board of a community college district, or upon a written statement of charges formulated by the governing board, charging a permanent employee of the district with immoral conduct, conviction of a felony or of any crime involving moral turpitude, with incompetency due to mental disability, or with willful refusal to perform regular assignments without reasonable cause, as prescribed by reasonable rules and regulations of the employing district, the governing board may, if it deems such action necessary, immediately suspend the employee from his or her duties and give notice to him or her of his or her suspension, and that 30 days after service of the notice, he or she will be dismissed, unless he or she demands a hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 127.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87736.

Whenever any academic employee of a community college district is charged with the commission of any sex offense, as defined in Section 87010, by complaint, information, or indictment filed in a court of competent jurisdiction, the governing board of the district may immediately place the employee upon compulsory leave of absence for a period of time extending for not more than 10 days after the date of the entry of the judgment in the proceedings. The governing board of the district may extend the compulsory leave of absence of the employee beyond such period by giving notice to the employee within 10 days after the entry of judgment in the proceedings that the employee will be dismissed at the expiration of 30 days from the date of service of the notice, unless the employee demands a hearing as provided in Section 87737.

Any employee placed upon compulsory leave of absence pursuant to this section shall continue to be paid his or her regular salary during the period of his or her compulsory leave of absence, if and during such time as the employee furnishes to the community college district a suitable bond, or other security acceptable to the governing board, as a guarantee that the employee will repay to the district the amount of salary so paid to the employee during the period of the compulsory leave of absence in case the employee is convicted of such charges, or fails or refuses to return to service following an acquittal of the offense or dismissal of the charges. If the employee is acquitted of the offense, or the charges against the employee are dismissed, the district shall reimburse the employee for the cost of the bond upon his or her return to service in the district. 

If the employee does not elect to furnish bond, or other security acceptable to the governing board of the district, and if the employee is acquitted of the offense, or the charges against the employee are dismissed, the district shall pay to the employee his or her full compensation for the period of the compulsory leave of absence upon his or her return to service in the district.

Whenever any academic employee of a community college district is charged with the commission of any narcotics offense as defined, in Section 87011 of the Education Code, or a violation of Section 261.5 of the Penal Code, Sections 11357 to 11361, inclusive, 11363, 11364, or 11377 to 11382, inclusive, insofar as such sections relate to any controlled substances in paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11056, or any controlled substances in subdivision (d) of Section 11054, except paragraphs (10), (11), (12), and (17) of such subdivision, of the Health and Safety Code, by complaint, information, or indictment filed in a court of competent jurisdiction, the governing board of the district may immediately place the employee upon compulsory leave in accordance with the procedure in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 128.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87737.

The notice of suspension and intention to dismiss, shall be in writing and be served upon the employee personally or by United States registered mail addressed to the employee at his or her last known address. A copy of the charges filed, together with a copy of the provisions of Section 87736, shall be attached to the notice. If the employee demands a hearing within 30 days, the matter shall proceed to arbitration or hearing, as the case may be, as specified in Article 4. If the employee does not demand a hearing within the 30-day period, his or her dismissal shall be effective upon the expiration of 30 days after service of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 129.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

87740.

(a) No later than March 15 and before an employee is given notice by the governing board that his or her services will not be required for the ensuing year, the governing board and the employee shall be given written notice by the superintendent of the district or his or her designee, or in the case of a district which has no superintendent by the clerk or secretary of the governing board, that it has been recommended that the notice be given to the employee, and stating the reasons therefor.

If a contract employee has been in the employ of the district for less than 45 days on March 15, the giving of the notice may be deferred until the 45th day of employment and all time periods and deadline dates prescribed in this subdivision shall be coextensively extended.

Until the employee has requested a hearing as provided in subdivision (b) or has waived his or her right to a hearing, the notice and the reasons therefor shall be confidential and shall not be divulged by any person, except as may be necessary in the performance of duties. However, the violation of this requirement of confidentiality, in and of itself, shall not in any manner be construed as affecting the validity of any hearing conducted pursuant to this section.

(b) The employee may request a hearing to determine if there is cause for not reemploying him or her for the ensuing year. A request for a hearing shall be in writing and shall be delivered to the person who sent the notice pursuant to subdivision (a), on or before a date specified in that subdivision, which shall not be less than seven days after the date on which the notice is served upon the employee. If an employee fails to request a hearing on or before the date specified, this failure to do so shall constitute waiver of his or her right to a hearing. The notice provided for in subdivision (a) shall advise the employee of the provisions of this subdivision.

(c) In the event a hearing is requested by the employee, the proceeding shall be conducted and a decision made in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the governing board shall have all the power granted to an agency in that chapter, except that all of the following shall apply:

(1) The respondent shall file his or her notice of defense, if any, within five days after service upon him or her of the accusation and he or she shall be notified of this five-day period for filing the accusation.

(2) The discovery authorized by Section 11507.6 of the Government Code shall be available only if request is made therefor within 15 days after service of the accusation, and the notice required by Section 11505 of the Government Code shall so indicate.

(3) The hearing shall be conducted by an administrative law judge who shall prepare a proposed decision, containing findings of fact and a determination as to whether the charges sustained by the evidence are related to the welfare of the colleges and the students thereof. The proposed decision shall be prepared for the governing board and shall contain a determination as to the sufficiency of the cause and a recommendation as to disposition. However, the governing board shall make the final determination as to the sufficiency of the cause and disposition. None of the findings, recommendations, or determinations contained in the proposed decision prepared by the administrative law judge shall be binding on the governing board or on any court in future litigation. Copies of the proposed decision shall be submitted to the governing board and to the employee on or before May 7 of the year in which the proceeding is commenced. All expenses of the hearing, including the cost of the administrative law judge, shall be paid by the governing board from the district funds.

The board may adopt, from time to time, rules and procedures not inconsistent with this section that may be necessary to effectuate this section.

(d) The governing board’s determination not to reemploy a contract employee for the ensuing college year shall be for cause only. The determination of the governing board as to the sufficiency of the cause pursuant to this section shall be conclusive, but the cause shall relate solely to the welfare of the colleges and the students thereof and provided that cause shall include termination of services for the reasons specified in Section 87743. The decision made after the hearing shall be effective on May 15 of the year the proceeding is commenced.

(e) Notice to the contract employee by the governing board that the employee’s service will not be required for the ensuing year shall be given no later than May 15.

(f) If a governing board notifies a contract employee that his or her services will not be required for the ensuing year, the board, within 10 days after delivery to it of the employee’s written request, shall provide him or her with a statement of its reasons for not reemploying him or her for the ensuing college year.

(g) Any notice or request shall be deemed sufficient when it is delivered in person to the employee to whom it is directed, or when it is deposited in the United States registered mail, postage prepaid and addressed to the last known address of the employee.

(h) If the governing board does not give notice provided for in subdivision (e) on or before May 15, the employee shall be deemed reemployed for the ensuing school year.

(i) If, after request for hearing pursuant to subdivision (b), any continuance is granted pursuant to Section 11524 of the Government Code, the dates prescribed in subdivisions (c), (d), (e) and (h) that occur on or after the date of granting the continuance shall be extended for a period of time equal to the continuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 168.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Reduction in Services [87743. - 87746.]

87743.

No tenured employee shall be deprived of his or her position for causes other than those specified in Sections 87453, 87467, and 87484, and Sections 87732 to 87739, inclusive, and no probationary employee shall be deprived of his or her position for cause other than as specified in Section 87740 except in accordance with the provisions of Section 87463 and Sections 87743 to 87762, inclusive.

Whenever in any school year the average daily attendance in all of the schools of a district for the first six months in which school is in session shall have declined below the corresponding period of either of the previous two school years, or whenever a particular kind of service is to be reduced or discontinued not later than the beginning of the following school year, and when in the opinion of the governing board of the district it shall have become necessary by reason of either of these conditions to decrease the number of tenured employees in the district, the governing board may terminate the services of not more than a corresponding percentage of the employees of the district, tenured as well as probationary, at the close of the school year. However, the services of no tenured employee may be terminated under this section while any probationary employee, or any other employee with less seniority, is retained to render a service in a faculty service area in which the records of the district maintained pursuant to Section 87743.4 reflect that the tenured employee possesses the minimum qualifications prescribed by the board of governors and is competent to serve under district competency criteria.

Notice of the termination of services either for a reduction in attendance or reduction or discontinuance of a particular kind of service to take effect not later than the beginning of the following school year, shall be given before the 15th of May in the manner prescribed in Section 87740 and services of the employees shall be terminated in the inverse of the order in which they were employed, as determined by the board in accordance with Sections 87413 and 87414. In the event that a tenured or probationary employee is not given the notices and a right to a hearing as provided for in Section 87740, he or she shall be deemed reemployed for the ensuing school year.

The board shall make assignments and reassignments in a manner that employees shall be retained to render any service which their seniority and qualifications entitle them to render.
